Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2773.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Heading change A. The chapter heading of title 1, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "governmental maintenance operations and capital projects" to "government operations and resources". B. The article heading of title 1, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "GENERAL PROVISIONS" to "governmental maintenance operations and capital projects". Sec. 2. Title 1, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2, to read: ARTICLE 2. GOVERNMENT RESOURCES START_STATUTE1-821. Prohibited use of government resources; international criminal court Notwithstanding any other law and except as required by a court order, an agency of this state, a political subdivision of this state or an employee of an agency or political subdivision of this state acting in the employee's official capacity may not do any of the following: 1. Knowingly and wilfully participate in any way in the Enforcement or implementation of any arrest, order, rule, regulation, judgment, policy or mandate of any kind of the International Criminal Court. 2. Use any assets, state monies or monies allocated by this state to political subdivisions of this state on or after the effective date of this section, in whole or in part, to engage in any activity that aids the International Criminal Court in enforcing or implementing an arrest, order, rule, regulation, judgment, policy or mandate of any kind in this state. END_STATUTE